Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.410

Mobile homes, recreational or commercial vehicles—Meeting requirements of chapter deemed compliance with county or city ordinances.

Any mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, and/or park trailer that meets the requirements prescribed under RCW 43.22.340 shall not be required to comply with any ordinances of a city or county prescribing requirements for body and frame design, construction or plumbing, heating and electrical equipment installed in mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers.

[ 1999 c 22 s 8; 1995 c 280 s 12; 1970 ex.s. c 27 s 8; 1967 c 157 s 8.]